Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-352.01
Adult protective services official, defined.

Adult protective services official means an individual who is employed by the department and who develops and implements adult protective services.

Laws 2026, LB1055, § 3.
July 18, 2026